New Jersey, session 222, A691.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2010, c.3 (C.11A:6-19.2) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a political subdivision of the State, or an agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, that has adopted the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, shall not pay supplemental compensation to any officer or employee for accumulated unused sick leave in an amount in excess of [$15,000] $10,000. Supplemental compensation shall be payable only at the time of retirement from a State-administered or locally-administered retirement system based on the leave credited on the date of retirement.  [This provision shall apply only to officers and employees who commence service with the political subdivision of the State, or the agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.3.  This section shall not be construed to affect the terms in any collective negotiations agreement with a relevant provision in force on that effective date.] An officer or employee who on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date, has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than $10,000, whichever is greater. (cf: P.L.2010, c.3, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.2010, c.3 (C.40A:9-10.4) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a political subdivision of the State, or an agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, that has not adopted the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, shall not pay supplemental compensation to any officer or employee for accumulated unused sick leave in an amount in excess of [$15,000] $10,000. Supplemental compensation shall be payable only at the time of retirement from a State-administered or locally-administered retirement system based on the leave credited on the date of retirement.  [This provision shall apply only to officers and employees who commence service with the political subdivision of the State, or the agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.3.  This section shall not be construed to affect the terms in any collective negotiations agreement with a relevant provision in force on that effective date.] An officer or employee who on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date, has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than $10,000, whichever is greater. (cf: P.L.2010, c.3, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.2010, c.2 (C.18A:30-3.6) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a board of education, or an agency or instrumentality thereof, shall not pay supplemental compensation to any officer or employee for accumulated unused sick leave in an amount in excess of [$15,000] $10,000. Supplemental compensation shall be payable only at the time of retirement from a State-administered or locally-administered retirement system based on the leave credited on the date of retirement.  [This provision shall apply only to officers and employees who commence service with the board of education, or the agency or instrumentality thereof, on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.3.  This section shall not be construed to affect the terms in any collective negotiations agreement with a relevant provision in force on that effective date.] An officer or employee who on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date, has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than $10,000, whichever is greater. (cf: P.L.2010, c.3, s.3) 4.    Section 4 of P.L.2010, c.3 (C.40A:9-10.5) is amended to read as follows: 4.    Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, an officer or employee of a political subdivision of the State, or an agency, authority, or instrumentality thereof, that has not adopted the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, who does not take vacation leave that accrues in a given year because of business demands shall be granted that accrued leave only during the next succeeding year.  However, vacation leave not taken in a given year because of duties directly related to a state of emergency declared by the Governor may accumulate at the discretion of the appointing authority until, pursuant to a plan established by the officer or employee's appointing authority, the leave is used or the employee or officer is compensated for that leave, which shall not be subject to collective negotiation or collective bargaining.  [This provision shall apply only to officers and employees who commence service with the political subdivision of the State, or the agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.3.  This section shall not be construed to affect the terms in any collective negotiations agreement with a relevant provision in force on that effective date.] A person who is an officer or employee on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and has previously accrued vacation leave shall be eligible and shall be permitted to retain and use that accrued vacation leave. (cf: P.L.2010, c.3, s.2) 5.    Section 5 of P.L.2010, c.3 (C.18A:30-9.1) is amended to read as follows: 5.    Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, an officer or employee of a board of education, or an agency or instrumentality thereof, who does not take vacation leave that accrues in a given year because of business demands shall be granted that accrued leave only during the next succeeding year.  However, vacation leave not taken in a given year because of duties directly related to a state of emergency declared by the Governor may accumulate at the discretion of the appointing authority until, pursuant to a plan established by the officer or employee's appointing authority, the leave is used or the employee or officer is compensated for that leave, which shall not be subject to collective negotiation or collective bargaining.  [This provision shall apply only to officers and employees who commence service with the board of education, or the agency or instrumentality thereof, on or after the effective date of P.L.2010, c.3.  This section shall not be construed to affect the terms in any collective negotiations agreement with a relevant provision in force on that effective date.] A person who is an officer or employee on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and has previously accrued vacation leave shall be eligible and shall be permitted to retain and use that accrued vacation leave. (cf: P.L.2010, c.3, s.5) 6.    N.J.S.11A:6-19 is amended to read as follows: 11A:6-19.   Supplemental compensation; computation; limitation. Supplemental compensation shall be computed at the rate of one-half of the eligible employee's daily rate of pay for each day of accumulated sick leave based upon the compensation received during the last year of employment prior to the effective date of retirement, but supplemental compensation shall not exceed [$15,000.00] $10,000. If an employee dies after the effective date of retirement but before payment is made, payment shall be made to the employee's estate. An officer or employee who on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date, has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than $10,000, whichever is greater. (cf: N.J.S.11A:6-19) 7.    Section 42 of P.L.2007, c.92 (C.11A:6-19.1) is amended to read as follows: 42.  Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a political subdivision of the State, or an agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, that has adopted the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, shall not pay supplemental compensation to any officer or employee for accumulated unused sick leave in an amount in excess of [$15,000] $10,000, except that an officer or employee who: (1)   on the effective date of [P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et al.)] P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than [$15,000] $10,000, whichever is greater; or (2)   becomes an officer or employee after the effective date of [P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et al.)] P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and  has previously accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so previously accumulated or not more than [$15,000] $10,000, whichever is greater. Supplemental compensation shall be payable only at the time of retirement from a State-administered or locally-administered retirement system based on the leave credited on the date of retirement. As used in this section, "officer or employee" means an elected official; or a person appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, or appointed by the Governor to serve at the pleasure of the Governor only during his or her term of office; or a person appointed by an elected public official or elected governing body of a political subdivision of the State, with the specific consent or approval of the elected governing body of the political subdivision that is substantially similar in nature to the advice and consent of the Senate for appointments by the Governor of the State as that similarity is determined by the elected governing body and set forth in an adopted ordinance or resolution, pursuant to guidelines or policy that shall be established by the Local Finance Board in the Department of Community Affairs, but not including a person who is employed or appointed in the regular or normal course of employment or appointment procedures and consented to or approved in a general or routine manner appropriate for and followed by the political subdivision, or the agency, authority or instrumentality of a subdivision, or a person who holds a professional license or certificate to perform and is performing as a certified health officer, tax assessor, tax collector, municipal planner, chief financial officer, registered municipal clerk, construction code official, licensed uniform subcode inspector, qualified purchasing agent, or certified public works manager. (cf: P.L.2007, c.92, s.42) 8.    Section 44 of P.L.2007, c.92 (C.18A:30-3.5) is amended to read as follows: 44.  Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a board of education, or an agency or instrumentality thereof, shall not pay supplemental compensation to any officer or employee for accumulated unused sick leave in an amount in excess of [$15,000] $10,000, except that an officer or employee who: (1)   on the effective date of [P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et al.)] P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than [$15,000] $10,000, whichever is greater; or (2)   becomes an officer or employee after the effective date of [P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et al.)] P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and  has previously accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so previously accumulated or not more than [$15,000] $10,000, whichever is greater. Supplemental compensation shall be payable only at the time of retirement from a State-administered or locally-administered retirement system based on the leave credited on the date of retirement. As used in this section, "officer or employee" means an elected official; or a person appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, or appointed by the Governor to serve at the pleasure of the Governor only during his or her term of office; or a person appointed by an elected public official or elected governing body of the political subdivision, with the specific consent or approval of the elected governing body of the political subdivision that is substantially similar in nature to the advice and consent of the Senate for appointments by the Governor of the State as that similarity is determined by the elected governing body and set forth in an adopted resolution, pursuant to guidelines or policy that shall be established by the Department of Education, but not including a person who is employed or appointed in the regular or normal course of employment or appointment procedures and consented to or approved in a general or routine manner appropriate for and followed by the political subdivision, or the agency or instrumentality thereof. (cf: P.L.2007, c.92, 44) 9.    Section 43 of P.L.2007, c. 92 (C.40A:9-10.2) is amended to read as follows: 43.  Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a political subdivision of the State, or an agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, that has not adopted the provisions of Title 11A of the New Jersey Statutes, shall not pay supplemental compensation to any officer or employee for accumulated unused sick leave in an amount in excess of [$15,000] $10,000, except that an officer or employee who: (1)   on the effective date of [P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et al.)] P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or upon the expiration of a collective negotiations agreement or contract of employment applicable to that officer or employee in effect on that date has accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so accumulated or not more than [$15,000] $10,000, whichever is greater; or (2)   becomes an officer or employee after the effective date of [P.L.2007, c.92 (C.43:15C-1 et al.)] P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and  has previously accrued supplemental compensation based upon accumulated unused sick leave shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive for any unused leave not more than the amount so previously accumulated or not more than [$15,000] $10,000, whichever is greater. Supplemental compensation shall be payable only at the time of retirement from a State-administered or locally-administered retirement system based on the leave credited on the date of retirement. As used in this section, "officer or employee" means an elected official; or a person appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, or appointed by the Governor to serve at the pleasure of the Governor only during his or her term of office; or a person appointed by an elected public official or elected governing body of a political subdivision of the State, with the specific consent or approval of the elected governing body of the political subdivision that is substantially similar in nature to the advice and consent of the Senate for appointments by the Governor of the State as that similarity is determined by the elected governing body and set forth in an adopted ordinance or resolution, pursuant to guidelines or policy that shall be established by the Local Finance Board in the Department of Community Affairs, but not including a person who is employed or appointed in the regular or normal course of employment or appointment procedures and consented to or approved in a general or routine manner appropriate for and followed by the political subdivision, or the agency, authority or instrumentality of a subdivision, or a person who holds a professional license or certificate to perform and is performing as a certified health officer, tax assessor, tax collector, municipal planner, chief financial officer, registered municipal clerk, construction code official, licensed uniform subcode inspector, qualified purchasing agent, or certified public works manager. (cf: P.L.2007, c.92, s.43) 10.  This act shall take effect immediately.